Utah statutes.
26-8a-307.   Patient destination.
(1)  If an individual being transported by a ground or air ambulance is in
critical or unstable condition, the ground or air ambulance shall transport
the patient to the trauma center or closest emergency patient receiving
facility appropriate to adequately treat the patient.
(2)  If the patient's condition is not critical or unstable as determined by
medical control, the ground or air ambulance may transport the patient to the:
(a)  hospital, emergency patient receiving facility, or other medical provider
chosen by the patient and approved by medical control as appropriate for the
patient's condition and needs; or
(b)  nearest hospital, emergency patient receiving facility, or other medical
provider approved by medical control as appropriate for the patient's
condition and needs if the patient expresses no preference.
